Connecticut, session 2026, HB05518.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 21a-150 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
For the purposes of this section and sections 21a-150a to 21a-150j,
inclusive, as amended by this act:
(1) "Approved laboratory" means a laboratory [registered] certified
by the Department of Public Health pursuant to section 19a-29a, as
amended by this act, or certified by the United States Environmental
Protection Agency to analyze drinking water;
(2) "Approved source" means the source of any bottled water,
including, but not limited to, a spring, artesian well, drilled well or
public water supply, that, for a source located in the state, has been
inspected and approved by the Department of Public Health, or for a
source located out of state, has been inspected and approved by the
government entities having jurisdiction to regulate the use of such out-

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
of-state source;
(3) "Artesian well water" means bottled natural water obtained from
a well tapping an aquifer in which the level of the water is above the
bottom of the confining bed of the aquifer and in which the hydraulic
pressure of the water in the aquifer is greater than the atmospheric
pressure;
(4) "Bottled water", or any term of similar import, means water
obtained from an approved source that is packaged for sale or
distribution. "Bottled water" shall not include any soda or seltzer that is
packaged for sale or distribution;
(5) "Bottler" means any person, firm or corporation engaging in the
business of bottling or distributing water for sale or distribution;
(6) "Distilled water" means purified water that has been produced by
a process of distillation;
(7) "Drinking water" means bottled water that has been distilled,
fluoridated or purified or that has been disinfected by a process of
ozonation and filtration or any substantially similar disinfection
process;
(8) "Fluoridated water" means bottled water that contains fluoride
ions in an amount not less than eight-tenths of one milligram per liter
and not more than one and two-tenths milligrams per liter or such
alternative concentration limit as the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection, with the advice and assistance of the Commissioner of Public
Health, may determine by regulations adopted in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54 and that otherwise complies with the
provisions of Subsections (b), (c) and (d) of 21 CFR 165.110;
(9) "Mineral water" means natural water that contains not less than
five hundred parts per million total dissolved solids;
Public Act No. 26-142 2 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
(10) "Natural water" means bottled spring water, artesian well water
or well water, that has been obtained from any approved source other
than a public water supply and that has not been modified by blending
with water from any other source or by the addition or deletion of any
mineral other than any addition or deletion that may occur as a result of
ozonation, filtration or any other substantially similar disinfection
process;
(11) "Perfluoroalkyl substance" means perfluorooctanoic acid,
perfluorooctane sulfonic acid, perfluoronoanoic acid, perfluorohexane
sulfonic acid, hexafluoropropylene oxide dimer acid or any other
perfluoroalkyl substance that is listed in 40 CFR 141.903, as amended
from time to time, or set forth in regulations adopted pursuant to section
25-32, as amended by this act;
[(11)] (12) "Principal display panel" means the portion of a label on
any container or package that is most likely to be displayed, presented
or examined under normal and customary conditions of display and
purchase of bottled water;
[(12)] (13) "Public water supply" means any individual, partnership,
association, corporation, municipality or other entity, or the lessee
thereof, that owns, maintains, operates, manages, controls or employs
any pond, lake, reservoir, well, stream or distributing plant or system
for the purpose of supplying water by service connections or pipe
distribution systems to two or more hotels, motels, boardinghouses,
apartments, stores, office buildings, institutions, mechanical or
manufacturing establishments or other places of business or industry to
which water is supplied by a water company or to twenty-five or more
persons on a regular basis;
[(13)] (14) "Purified water" means bottled water that is produced by
distillation, deionization, reverse osmosis or any other suitable process
and that meets standards established for purified water in the twentieth
Public Act No. 26-142 3 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
edition of the United States Pharmacopoeia;
[(14)] (15) "Spring water" means natural water obtained from an
underground formation from which water flows naturally to the surface
of the earth; [and]
(16) "Unregulated contaminant" means any chemical, physical,
biological or radiological substance in a bottled water source, except a
perfluoroalkyl substance, for which there is no state or federal statutory
or regulatory drinking water health standard, and that is listed in 40
CFR 141.40, as amended from time to time; and
[(15)] (17) "Well water" means natural water obtained from a hole
bored, drilled or otherwise constructed in the ground, that taps the
water of an aquifer.
Sec. 2. Subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 21a-150a of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(2) A bottler selling or distributing bottled water obtained from a
source located in the state shall obtain approval for the use of such
source from the Department of Public Health. The Department of Public
Health shall inspect each bottled water source located in the state and,
if such source meets quality and safety requirements, issue an approval
for such source. An approval issued by the Department of Public Health
pursuant to this subsection shall contain any terms or conditions
deemed necessary by the Commissioner of Public Health to address the
quality and safety of the source and shall expire three years from the
date of issue.
Sec. 3. Subsection (c) of section 21a-150b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-142 4 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
(c) (1) The Commissioner of Public Health shall issue a schedule
containing (A) a list of perfluoroalkyl substances and unregulated
contaminants, and (B) acceptable levels for (i) such perfluoroalkyl
substances, based on levels set forth in 40 CFR 141.903, as amended from
time to time, and (ii) unregulated contaminants, based on levels set forth
in 40 CFR 141.40, as amended from time to time.
[(c)] (2) On or before January 1, [2022] 2027, and annually thereafter,
qualified employees of a bottler shall [(1)] (A) collect samples of water
from each approved source that is located in the state, that has been
inspected and approved by the Department of Public Health pursuant
to subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 21a-150a, as amended by
this act, and is used by such bottler, prior to any treatment, to test for
compliance with the (i) levels or standards governing perfluoroalkyl
substances and [other] unregulated contaminants established in the
most recent schedule issued pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection, and (ii) physical, chemical, radiological and microbiological
standards established in regulations adopted pursuant to section 25-32,
as amended by this act, and [(2)] (B) have such samples analyzed by an
environmental laboratory [registered] certified by the Department of
Public Health pursuant to section 19a-29a, as amended by this act, that
has the Environmental Protection Agency approved certification to
conduct such analysis. [As used in this subsection, "unregulated
contaminant" means a contaminant for which the Commissioner of
Public Health, pursuant to section 22a-471, has set a level at which such
contaminant creates or can reasonably be expected to create an
unacceptable risk of injury to the health or safety of persons drinking
such source of water.]
Sec. 4. Subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 21a-150c of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(2) Collect, not less than once annually, a representative sample from
Public Act No. 26-142 5 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
a batch or segment of a continuous production of each type of bottled
water sold by such bottler in this state, and have such sample analyzed
by an approved laboratory to determine whether such sample complies
with the chemical, inorganic, organic, physical and radiological
standards set forth in regulations adopted by the Department of Public
Health pursuant to section [19a-36] 25-32, as amended by this act,
concerning public drinking water. Each bottler that uses water obtained
from an out-of-state source may meet the requirements of this
subdivision by demonstrating compliance with substantially similar
standards established by the government entity having jurisdiction to
regulate the use of such source.
Sec. 5. Subsection (d) of section 21a-150d of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(d) A bottler shall report, in a form and manner prescribed by the
Commissioner of Public Health, the results of the analysis conducted
pursuant to subsection (c) of section 21a-150b, as amended by this act,
to the Department of Public Health and the Department of Consumer
Protection not later than nine calendar days after receipt of the results
from the environmental laboratory. If such results [exceed the level set
by the Commissioner of Public Health pursuant to section 22a-471 for
such perfluoroalkyl substances and other unregulated contaminants] do
not meet the requirements for (1) levels or standards governing
perfluoroalkyl substances and unregulated contaminants established
pursuant to the provisions of section 21a-150b, as amended by this act,
or (2) physical, chemical, radiological and microbiological standards
established in regulations adopted pursuant to section 25-32, as
amended by this act, the Department of Public Health may require such
bottler to discontinue use of its approved source until such source [no
longer creates an unacceptable risk of injury to the health or safety of
persons drinking the bottled water that comes from such source] meets
Public Act No. 26-142 6 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
the requirements for such levels or standards. The Department of Public
Health shall notify the Department of Consumer Protection of any
source for which the Department of Public Health has discontinued use
until such source no longer creates an unacceptable risk of injury to the
health or safety of the persons drinking the bottled water that comes
from such source. [As used in this subsection, "unregulated
contaminant" means a contaminant for which the Commissioner of
Public Health, pursuant to section 22a-471, has set a level at which such
contaminant creates or can reasonably be expected to create an
unacceptable risk of injury to the health or safety of the persons drinking
such source of water.]
Sec. 6. Section 19a-37k of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The owner of any residential or commercial property shall notify each
tenant of any leased or rented unit located on such property and the
lessee of such property whenever any testing of the water supply for
such property indicates that the water exceeds [a] any maximum
contaminant level [applicable to] for water supply systems [for any
contaminant listed] set forth in the regulations of Connecticut state
agencies or for [any contaminant listed on the state drinking water
action level list established pursuant to section 22a-471] perfluoroalkyl
substances and unregulated contaminants established pursuant to the
provisions of section 21a-150b, as amended by this act. As soon as
practicable, but not later than forty-eight hours after receiving
notification of the results of such testing, the owner shall forward a copy
of such notification to each such tenant and lessee. The local director of
health shall take all reasonable steps to verify that such owner
forwarded the notice required pursuant to this section.
Sec. 7. Section 19a-29a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-142 7 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Environmental laboratory" means any facility or other area,
including, but not limited to, an outdoor area where testing occurs, used
for microbiological, chemical, radiological or other analyte testing of
drinking waters, ground waters, sea waters, rivers, streams and surface
waters, recreational waters, fresh water sources, wastewaters,
swimming pools, construction, renovation and demolition building
materials, soil, solid waste, animal and plant tissues, sewage, sewage
effluent, sewage sludge or any other matrix for the purpose of providing
information on the sanitary quality or the amount of pollution or any
substance prejudicial to health or the environment. "Environmental
laboratory" does not include a publicly-owned treatment works, as
defined in section 22a-521, that performs only physical, residue,
microbiological and biological oxygen demand tests for its own facility
for which results are required by or submitted to the Department of
Energy and Environmental Protection to comply with permits or
authorizations issued pursuant to section 22a-6k, 22a-430 or 22a-430b,
or a pollution abatement facility, as defined in either section 22a-423 or
22a-475, that tests for pH, turbidity, conductivity, salinity and oxidation-
reduction potential, and tests for residual chlorine for its own facility for
which results are required by or submitted to the Department of Energy
and Environmental Protection to comply with permits or authorizations
issued pursuant to section 22a-6k, 22a-430 or 22a-430b;
(2) "Analyte" means a microbiological, chemical, radiological or other
component of a matrix being measured by an analytical test; [and]
(3) "Certification" means an approval issued by the Department of
Public Health to an environmental laboratory to operate and that sets
forth the specific analyte that may be tested and specific testing method
that may be utilized by the environmental laboratory;
[(3)] (4) "Matrix" means the substance or medium in which an analyte
Public Act No. 26-142 8 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
[is] may be contained [,] that may include drinking water or wastewater;
(5) "Out-of-state environmental laboratory" means an environmental
laboratory that is located and physically operates in another state where
the results of any testing conducted are used to demonstrate compliance
with any statutory or regulatory requirements of this state; and
(6) "Service center" means a collection site located in the state
operated solely for the purpose of collecting samples to be tested at a
certified environmental laboratory or an out-of-state environmental
laboratory.
(b) The Department of Public Health shall [(1)] adopt regulations, in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to establish [reasonable]
standards governing environmental laboratory operations and facilities,
including, but not limited to, (1) service centers, (2) personnel
qualifications, (3) certification, [for] (4) testing [,] for analytes, (5) levels
of acceptable proficiency in testing programs approved by the
department, (6) the collection, acceptance and suitability of samples for
analysis, and (7) such other pertinent laboratory functions, including the
establishment of advisory committees, as may be necessary to ensure
environmental quality, public health and safety. [, and (2) establish one
or more schedules of the amounts of civil penalties that may be imposed
under this section. Each registered environmental laboratory shall
comply with all standards for environmental laboratories established by
the department and shall be subject to inspection by said department,
including inspection of all records necessary to carry out the purposes
of this section. The Commissioner of Public Health may revoke or
otherwise limit the license of any environmental laboratory that fails to
comply with the provisions of this section or regulations adopted under
this section.]
(c) [The Commissioner of Public Health shall determine whether it is
necessary for the protection of the public health or the environment for
Public Act No. 26-142 9 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
an environmental laboratory to be registered and to have certification to
conduct a test for an analyte in a matrix. If the commissioner determines
that it is necessary for the environmental laboratory to be registered,
such environmental laboratory shall obtain from the commissioner a
certification to conduct such tests for analytes.] No person shall operate,
manage, own or control an environmental laboratory that tests for
analytes identified on the list published by the commissioner pursuant
to subsection (d) of this section for the purpose of providing information
on the sanitary quality or the amount of pollution of any substance
prejudicial to health or the environment [for which the commissioner
has determined registration and certification is required without having
first registered and obtained such certification] without a certification.
The commissioner shall not issue a certification to an environmental
laboratory until such environmental laboratory demonstrates
compliance with applicable statutory and regulatory requirements.
(d) The commissioner shall, annually, publish a list setting forth all
analytes and matrices for which a certification for testing is required.
Such list shall include the specific methods acceptable for all testing of
analytes and matrices.
(e) Each application for [registration of an environmental laboratory
and for certification for testing any analyte] certification shall be (1)
made on forms provided by said department, [shall be] (2) except for an
environmental lab owned or operated by the state, accompanied by a
fee of one thousand two hundred fifty dollars, and [shall be] (3) executed
by the owner or owners or by a responsible officer authorized to do so
by the agency, [firm or corporation] person or entity owning the
environmental laboratory. Upon receipt of any such application, the
department shall make such inspections and investigations as are
necessary and shall deny [registration] certification when operation of
the environmental laboratory would be in violation of applicable
statutes or regulations or prejudicial to the health of the public.
Public Act No. 26-142 10 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
[Registration] Certification shall not be in force until notice of its
effective date and term has been sent to the applicant.
(f) Each [registration or] certification shall be issued for a period of
not less than twenty-four or more than twenty-seven months. [from any
deadline for applications established by the commissioner.] Renewal
applications shall be made (1) biennially within the twenty-fourth
month of the current registration; (2) before any change in ownership is
made; and (3) prior to any major expansion or alteration in, or changing
of, quarters.
(g) This section shall not apply to any environmental laboratory that
only provides laboratory services or information for the agency, person
[, firm or corporation] or entity which owns or operates such laboratory
and uses laboratory results solely for such agency's, person's or entity's
own information. No agency, person or entity shall use such results to
demonstrate compliance with any statutory or regulatory requirement.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, results from analyses
performed by certified water operators, or persons under the
supervision of certified water operators, at drinking water treatment
facilities may be used to confirm treatment effectiveness and for
regulatory reporting, when permitted by applicable law.
(h) If, upon review, investigation or inspection, the [Commissioner of
Public Health determines an] commissioner determines a certified
environmental laboratory has violated any provision of this section or
regulations adopted under this section, the commissioner may impose
a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars per violation per day
and issue such other orders as the commissioner determines necessary
to protect the public health. Upon notice of the issuance of an order or
imposition of the civil penalty, the commissioner shall provide the
environmental laboratory with an opportunity for a hearing. The
commissioner (1) may take any of the actions authorized under section
19a-494 against an environmental laboratory that fails to comply with
Public Act No. 26-142 11 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
the provisions of this section or regulations adopted thereunder, and (2)
shall summarily suspend the certification of an environmental
laboratory in advance of a final adjudication or during the appeals
process if the commissioner finds that the environmental laboratory
presents a clear and present danger to the public health and safety if
allowed to continue operating. Governmental immunity shall not be a
defense against the imposition of any civil penalty imposed pursuant to
this section. In determining the amount of the civil penalty to be
imposed on an environmental laboratory, the commissioner shall
consider the degree of the threat to public health or the environment,
the amount necessary to achieve compliance, and the history of
compliance [of] by the environmental laboratory. Any order or civil
penalty issued under this provision may be appealed in accordance with
the provisions of section 4-183.
(i) The failure of an environmental laboratory to pay a civil penalty
imposed by the commissioner shall be grounds for revocation of the
environmental laboratory's [registration and certification for testing]
certification.
(j) The commissioner may order an [unregistered] environmental
laboratory that is not certified to test an analyte to cease operations. The
commissioner may impose a civil fine not to exceed five thousand
dollars per violation per day to an environmental laboratory for
operating without a certification.
(k) The commissioner may request the Attorney General to petition
the Superior Court for an order to aid in enforcement of any provision
of this section.
(l) An out-of-state environmental laboratory that has not been issued
a certification by the commissioner shall not operate a service center
without obtaining approval from the commissioner. An out-of-state
environmental laboratory seeking to operate a service center shall apply
Public Act No. 26-142 12 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
for such approval in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner. The commissioner may approve a service center
operated by an out-of-state environmental laboratory if such
environmental laboratory demonstrates that (1) it maintains an active
certification from the state in which the environmental laboratory is
located to test for an analyte using a specific method on the list
published pursuant to subsection (d) of this section; and (2) the policies
and procedures governing the service center are sufficient to protect the
integrity of the samples to be tested. Such approval shall expire not later
than two years after the date on which the commissioner issues an initial
approval and may be renewed for a period of two years in a form and
manner prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner may inspect
a service center operated by an out-of-state environmental laboratory at
any time. The commissioner may revoke an approval obtained pursuant
to the provisions of this subsection if the commissioner determines that
revocation is necessary to protect the public health. The commissioner
may issue a civil fine up to five thousand dollars if the commissioner
determines that the out-of-state environmental laboratory violated any
provision of this section or regulations adopted thereunder per violation
per day. In assessing the amount of such civil penalty, the commissioner
shall consider the factors described in subsection (h) of this section.
Upon notice of the imposition of the civil penalty, the commissioner
shall provide the out-of-state environmental laboratory with an
opportunity for a hearing. Any revocation or civil penalty issued under
this subsection may be appealed in accordance with the provisions of
section 4-183.
Sec. 8. Subsection (a) of section 19a-14d of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) An occupational or professional license, permit, certification or
registration issued by the Department of Public Health pursuant to
Public Act No. 26-142 13 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
chapter 368v, 370, 372, 373, 375, 375a, 376, 376a, 376b, 376c, 377, 378,
378a, 379, 379a, 380, 381, 381a, 381b, 382a, 382b, 382c, 383, 383a, 383b,
383c, 383d, 383e, 383f, 383g, 383h, 384, 384a, 384b, 384c, 384d, 385, 386,
387, 387a, 388, 388a, 393a, 395, 397a, 398, 399, [400a,] 400c or 474 shall be
issued, in the occupation or profession applied for and at a practice level
determined by the department, to a person, including, but not limited
to, an active duty member of the armed forces of the United States or
such person's spouse, if:
(1) The person holds a valid license, permit, certification or
registration in at least one other jurisdiction in the United States in the
occupation or profession applied for;
(2) The person has practiced under such license, permit, certification
or registration for not less than four years;
(3) The person is in good standing in all jurisdictions in the United
States in which he or she holds a license, permit, certification or
registration and has not had a license, permit, certification or
registration revoked or discipline imposed by any jurisdiction in the
United States, does not have a complaint, allegation or investigation
related to unprofessional conduct pending in any jurisdiction, and has
not voluntarily surrendered a license, permit, certification or
registration while under investigation for unprofessional conduct in any
jurisdiction;
(4) The person satisfies any background check or character and fitness
check required of other applicants for the license, permit, certification or
registration; and
(5) The person pays all fees required of other applicants for the
license, permit, certification or registration.
Sec. 9. Section 19a-332 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-142 14 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
As used in subsection (c) of section 19a-14 and sections 19a-332 to
19a-332e, inclusive, as amended by this act, 20-435 to 20-442, inclusive,
as amended by this act, and 52-577a:
(1) "Asbestos" means the asbestiform varieties of actinolite, amosite,
anthophyllite, chrysotile, crocidolite and tremolite;
(2) "Asbestos abatement" means the removal, encapsulation,
enclosure, renovation, repair, demolition or other disturbance of
asbestos-containing materials or suspect asbestos-containing materials,
but does not include activities which are related to (A) the removal or
repair of asbestos cement pipe and are performed by employees of a
water company as defined in section 25-32a, or (B) the removal of
nonfriable asbestos-containing material found exterior to a building or
structure other than material defined as regulated asbestos-containing
material in 40 CFR 61, the National Emission Standards for Hazardous
Air Pollutants, as amended from time to time;
(3) "Asbestos abatement worker" means any employee of a licensed
asbestos contractor who engages in asbestos abatement, has completed
a training program approved by the department and has been issued a
certificate by the [department] commissioner;
(4) "Asbestos abatement site supervisor" means any asbestos
abatement worker employed by a licensed asbestos contractor who has
been specifically trained as a supervisor in a training program approved
by the [department] commissioner and who has been issued a certificate
by the [department] commissioner;
(5) "Asbestos-containing material" means material composed of
asbestos of any type and in an amount equal to or greater than one per
cent by weight, either alone or mixed with other fibrous or nonfibrous
material;
(6) "Asbestos contractor" means any person or entity engaged in
Public Act No. 26-142 15 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
asbestos abatement [whose employees actually perform] that actually
performs the asbestos abatement work and who has been issued a
license by the commissioner;
(7) "Asbestos consultant" means any person who engages in any
activity directly involved with asbestos consultation services and who
has been issued a [certificate] license by the commissioner; [and a license
by the department;]
(8) "Asbestos consultation services" means the inspection or
evaluation of a building for asbestos hazards, including, but not limited
to, the development of asbestos abatement plans, site inspections, air
monitoring and provisions of industrial hygiene services related to
asbestos abatement;
(9) "Authorized agent" means an officer or employee duly designated
by the commissioner;
(10) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Public Health;
(11) "Department" means the Department of Public Health; and
(12) "Suspect asbestos-containing materials" means interior and
exterior materials that have a reasonable likelihood of containing
asbestos based on their appearance, composition and use.
Sec. 10. Section 20-435 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
[On and after one year following the effective date of regulations
adopted pursuant to section 20-440, no] No person or entity shall
provide services as an asbestos contractor in this state without a license
issued by the Commissioner of Public Health. A person who provides
services as an asbestos contractor shall not perform any duties
associated with those of an asbestos abatement site supervisor unless
Public Act No. 26-142 16 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
such person is certified pursuant to the provisions of section 20-438, as
amended by this act. Applications for such license shall be made to the
Department of Public Health on forms provided by it, shall be
accompanied by a fee of six hundred twenty-five dollars and shall
contain such information regarding the applicant's qualifications as the
[department] commissioner may require in regulations adopted
pursuant to section 20-440, as amended by this act, including, but not
limited to, proof of a valid certification as an asbestos abatement site
supervisor if the applicant is an individual, and documentation
demonstrating that all employees have passed a training course, as
defined in section 20-439, as amended by this act, approved by the
[department and have been issued a certificate by the department]
commissioner. The department shall approve the technical, equipment
and personnel resources of each applicant. No person or entity shall be
issued a license to act as an asbestos contractor unless [he] such person
or entity obtains such approval. The commissioner may issue a license
under this section to any person [who] or entity that is licensed in
another state under a law [which] that provides standards which are
equal to or higher than those of Connecticut and is not subject to any
unresolved complaints or pending disciplinary actions. Licenses issued
pursuant to this section shall be renewed annually in accordance with
the provisions of section 19a-88, as amended by this act, upon payment
of a fee of six hundred twenty-five dollars.
Sec. 11. Section 20-436 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) [On and after one year following the effective date of regulations
adopted pursuant to section 20-440, no] No person shall [act as an]
provide asbestos consultant services in this state without a license
issued by the commissioner. Applications for such license shall be made
to the department on forms provided by it, and shall be accompanied
by a fee of two hundred fifty dollars, and shall contain such information
Public Act No. 26-142 17 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
regarding the applicant's qualifications and experience [in asbestos-
related consultations as the department] related to asbestos consultation
services, including supervised field experience related to asbestos
consultation services, as the commissioner may require in regulations
adopted pursuant to section 20-440, as amended by this act. [Except as
provided in this section, no person shall be licensed as an asbestos
consultant unless he completes a training course approved by the
department, passes an examination prescribed by the department,
receives a certificate issued by the department and satisfies employment
experience and educational requirements established by the
commissioner pursuant to section 20-441.] An applicant may apply for
licensure as an asbestos consultant in one or more of the asbestos
consultant services disciplines of inspector, management planner,
project designer or project monitor. The commissioner shall not issue a
license pursuant to the provisions of this section unless an applicant (1)
has successfully completed a training program approved by the
commissioner pursuant to the provisions of section 20-439, as amended
by this act, in the applicant's chosen asbestos consultant services
discipline, and (2) satisfies the experience and educational requirements
established in regulations adopted by the commissioner pursuant to
section 20-440, as amended by this act. Notwithstanding the provisions
of this subsection, an applicant need not be licensed while in the process
of completing any supervised field experience requirements required by
regulations adopted pursuant to section 20-440, as amended by this act.
(b) The commissioner may issue a license under this section without
examination to any person who is licensed in another state under a law
[which] that provides standards equal to or higher than those of
Connecticut and is not subject to any unresolved complaints or pending
disciplinary actions. Licenses issued pursuant to this section shall be
renewed annually in accordance with the provisions of section 19a-88,
as amended by this act, upon payment of a fee of two hundred fifty
dollars.
Public Act No. 26-142 18 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
[(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
a person who between July 1, 1985, and November 1, 1994, has been
employed for a minimum of two years as an asbestos consultant may be
licensed as an asbestos consultant without the educational requirements
established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.]
Sec. 12. Section 20-437 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
[On and after one year following the effective date of regulations
adopted pursuant to section 20-440, no] No person shall be employed as
an asbestos abatement worker unless such [worker] person has
completed a training program on asbestos hazards and abatement
procedures approved by the [department] commissioner pursuant to
section 20-439, as amended by this act, and has been issued a certificate
by the [department] commissioner. Applications for such certificate
shall be made to the department on forms provided by the department
and shall contain such information regarding the applicant's
qualifications as may be required in regulations adopted pursuant to
section 20-440, as amended by this act, and shall be accompanied by a
fee of fifty dollars. The [department] commissioner may issue a
certificate under this section to any person who is licensed or certified
in another state under a law [which] that provides standards which are
equal to or higher than those of this state, provided such person is not
subject to any unresolved complaints or pending disciplinary actions.
Certificates issued pursuant to this section shall be renewed annually in
accordance with the provisions of section 19a-88, as amended by this
act, upon payment of a fee of fifty dollars.
Sec. 13. Section 20-438 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
[On and after one year following the effective date of regulations
adopted pursuant to section 20-440, no] No person shall be employed as
Public Act No. 26-142 19 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
an asbestos abatement site supervisor unless such [worker] person has
completed a training program on the supervision of asbestos abatement
approved by the [department] commissioner pursuant to section 20-439,
as amended by this act, and has been issued a certificate by the
[department] commissioner. Applications for such certificate shall be
made to the department on forms provided by the department and shall
contain such information regarding the applicant's qualifications as may
be required in regulations adopted pursuant to section 20-440, as
amended by this act, and shall be accompanied by a fee of one hundred
dollars. The [department] commissioner may issue a certificate under
this section to any person who is licensed or certified in another state
under a law which provides standards which are equal to or higher than
those of the state of Connecticut, provided such person is not subject to
any unresolved complaints or pending disciplinary actions. Certificates
issued pursuant to this section shall be renewed annually in accordance
with the provisions of section 19a-88, as amended by this act, upon
payment of a fee of one hundred dollars.
Sec. 14. Section 20-439 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
[For purposes of this section, "asbestos training provider"] (a) As used
in this section: (1) "Asbestos training provider" means a person or entity
that offers a training program for asbestos abatement or asbestos
[consultation] consultant services and [certifies] issues a certificate of
completion for asbestos abatement workers, asbestos abatement site
supervisors [and] or asbestos consultants [. On and after October 1, 2017,
each asbestos training provider shall be certified by the department. The
department shall issue an initial certification of a provider upon the
provider's completion of an application and payment of a fee of fifty
dollars. The certification] in accordance with the requirements of the
United States Environmental Protection Agency's model accreditation
plan or equivalent training standards recognized by the commissioner;
Public Act No. 26-142 20 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
and (2) "training course" means a specific course offered as part of a
training program by a certified asbestos training provider for asbestos
abatement, asbestos site supervision or asbestos consultant services and
approved in accordance with this section.
(b) No person or entity shall act as an asbestos training provider
without a certificate issued by the commissioner. The commissioner
may issue such certificate upon the (1) applicant's submission of a
complete application, (2) payment of a fee of fifty dollars, and (3)
commissioner's determination that the applicant complies with any
requirements established in regulations adopted pursuant to section 20-
440, as amended by this act, including, but not limited to, standards for
the qualifications of instructors, recordkeeping and documentation
requirements for training course completion. Each certificate issued
pursuant to this section shall be renewed annually in accordance with
the provisions of subsection (e) of section 19a-88, as amended by this act,
upon payment of a fee of fifty dollars.
(c) An asbestos training provider shall submit any training program
to the commissioner for approval prior to implementing such training
program. The [department] commissioner shall approve a training
program for asbestos abatement or asbestos consultant services,
including each training course offered as part of such training program,
upon determination that such program complies with the requirements
of the United States Environmental Protection Agency's model
accreditation plan and such requirements as may be established in
regulations adopted pursuant to section 20-440, as amended by this act.
An asbestos training provider shall submit each training program to the
commissioner for reapproval once every three years. Each application
or reapplication for approval of a training program shall be
accompanied by a fee of five hundred dollars. Each application for
approval or reapproval of a refresher training program [as required by
section 20-441] shall be accompanied by a fee of two hundred fifty
Public Act No. 26-142 21 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
dollars. Each asbestos training provider shall furnish the department
with a list of the persons who have successfully completed [the] a
training program or training course [within] not later than thirty days
[of] after such completion. The [department] commissioner shall
conduct periodic reviews of approved training programs and training
courses and may revoke approval of a training program or training
course at any time [it] the commissioner determines that the training
program or training course fails to meet the requirements of this section
or established in such regulations.
Sec. 15. Section 20-440 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The commissioner shall adopt regulations in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54 to administer the provisions of subsection (c) of
section 19a-14, as amended by this act, and sections [19a-332 and] 20-435
to [20-441] 20-442a, inclusive, as amended by this act. Such regulations
shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (1) Passing scores for
licensure examination of [asbestos consultants] persons licensed
pursuant to this chapter; (2) standards for the licensing of asbestos
contractors and asbestos consultants in each of the asbestos consultant
disciplines and for the certification of asbestos abatement workers and
asbestos abatement site supervisors; (3) standards for approval of
asbestos training providers and training programs [of asbestos
abatement and asbestos consultation services] under section 20-439, as
amended by this act, including standards for successful completion of
such programs; (4) standards and procedures for suspension and
revocation of [certification] licensure of asbestos consultants, asbestos
abatement workers and asbestos abatement supervisors; and (5)
standards and procedures for suspension and [withdrawal] revocation
of approval of training programs.
(b) The commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54, to provide for the training of asbestos
Public Act No. 26-142 22 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
abatement site supervisors, asbestos abatement workers and asbestos
consultants, and for the specification of closely related environmental
science degrees. Regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection may
include retraining requirements for employees of asbestos contractors.
The regulations [required] adopted under [subsection (a) of this section]
this subsection shall be revised, as necessary, to ensure that such
regulations meet or exceed the requirements of the United States
Environmental Protection Agency's model accreditation plan in
accordance with federal regulations, as [from time to time] amended
from time to time. The commissioner may implement policies and
procedures necessary to administer the provisions of this section while
in the process of adopting such policies and procedures as regulations,
provided notice of intent to adopt regulations is published on the
eRegulations System not later than twenty days after the date of
implementation. Policies and procedures implemented pursuant to this
section shall be valid until final regulations are adopted in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 54.
Sec. 16. Subsection (a) of section 20-442a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) The department may deny an application of [an individual] a
person or entity or take any action set forth in section 19a-17 and
subsection (f) of section 19a-88 against a person or entity licensed, [or]
certified or approved pursuant to chapter 400a for [reasons including,
but not limited to,] the following reasons: (1) Conviction of a felony,
provided any action taken is based upon (A) the nature of the conviction
and its relationship to the license or certificate holder's ability to safely
or competently perform the work under such license, (B) information
pertaining to the degree of rehabilitation of the license or certificate
holder, and (C) the time elapsed since the conviction or release; (2) fraud
or deceit in the practice of such person's or entity's profession; (3)
Public Act No. 26-142 23 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
negligent, incompetent or wrongful conduct in professional activities;
(4) misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in the obtaining,
reinstatement or renewal of a license or certificate; or (5) violation of any
provision of chapter 400a, or any regulation adopted thereunder, or
chapter 368l. The commissioner may petition the superior court for the
judicial district of Hartford to enforce such order or any action taken
pursuant to section 19a-17. Notice of any contemplated action under
section 19a-17, the cause of action and the date of a hearing on the action
shall be given and an opportunity for hearing afforded in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 54.
Sec. 17. Section 19a-320 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Any resident of this state, or any corporation formed under the
law of this state, may erect, maintain and conduct a crematory in this
state and provide the necessary appliances and facilities for the disposal
by incineration of the bodies of the dead, in accordance with the
provisions of this section. The location of such crematory shall be within
the confines of an established cemetery containing not less than twenty
acres, which cemetery shall have been in existence and operation for at
least five years immediately preceding the time of the erection of such
crematory, or shall be within the confines of a plot of land approved for
the location of a crematory by the selectmen of any town, the mayor and
council or board of aldermen of any city and the warden and burgesses
of any borough; provided, in any town, city or borough having a zoning
commission, such commission shall have the authority to grant such
approval. On and after July 1, 2017, no new crematory shall be located
within five hundred feet of any residential structure or land for
residential purposes not owned by the owner of the crematory. The
location requirements in this subsection shall not apply to a crematory
performing only alkaline hydrolysis at a funeral home pursuant to
subsection (d) of this section.
Public Act No. 26-142 24 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
(b) Application for such approval shall be made in writing to the local
authority specified in subsection (a) of this section and a hearing shall
be held within the town, city or borough in which such location is
situated within sixty-five days from the date of receipt of such
application. Notice of such hearing shall be given to such applicant by
mail, postage paid, to the address given on the application, and to the
Commissioner of Public Health, and by publication twice in a
newspaper having a substantial circulation in the town, city or borough
at intervals of not less than two days, the first being not more than fifteen
days or less than ten days, and the second being not less than two days
before such hearing. The local authority shall approve or deny such
application within sixty-five days after such hearing, provided an
extension of time not to exceed a further period of sixty-five days may
be had with the consent of the applicant. The grounds for its action shall
be stated in the records of the authority. Each applicant shall pay a fee
of ten dollars, together with the costs of the publication of such notice
and the reasonable expense of such hearing, to the treasurer of such
town, city or borough.
(c) (1) No such crematory shall be erected until the plans therefor
have been filed with and approved by the Department of Public Health;
and no such crematory shall be used until it has been inspected and
received a certificate of inspection by said department and a fee of one
thousand two hundred fifty dollars is paid to the Department of Public
Health for its inspection and approval.
(2) Each holder of an inspection certificate shall, annually, on or
before July first, submit in writing to the Department of Public Health
an application for renewal of such certificate together with a fee of three
hundred fifteen dollars. If the department issues to such applicant such
an inspection certificate, the same shall be valid until July first next
following, unless revoked or suspended.
(3) Upon receipt of an application for a renewal of such certificate, the
Public Act No. 26-142 25 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
Department of Public Health shall make an inspection of each
crematory.
(4) A crematory shall be open at all times for inspection by the
Department of Public Health. The department may make inspections
whenever it deems advisable.
(5) If, upon inspection by the Department of Public Health, it is found
that such crematory is in such condition as to be detrimental to public
health, the department shall give to the applicant or operator of the
crematory notice and opportunity for hearing as provided in regulations
adopted by the Commissioner of Public Health, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54. The commissioner may, after such hearing,
revoke, suspend or refuse to issue or renew any such certificate upon
cause found at hearing. Any person aggrieved by the finding of or action
taken by the Department of Public Health may appeal therefrom in
accordance with the provisions of section 4-183.
(6) Any of the inspections provided for in this section may be made
by a person designated by the Department of Public Health or by a
representative of the Commissioner of Public Health.
(d) A crematory that performs alkaline hydrolysis shall be located on
the grounds of a funeral home licensed under chapter 385.
(e) The commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54, to implement the provisions of this section,
including, but not limited to, establishing technical standards for the use
of alkaline hydrolysis and other chemical processes for cremation and
the disposal of any products or by-products used in such processes.
Sec. 18. Section 8-2n of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
The zoning regulations adopted under section 8-2 or any special act
Public Act No. 26-142 26 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
shall not authorize the location of a crematory within five hundred feet
of any residential structure or land zoned for residential purposes not
owned by the owner of the crematory. As used in this section,
"crematory" means a building or structure containing one or more
cremation chambers or retorts for the cremation of dead human
bodies or large animals but does not include a funeral home that
performs cremation only by alkaline hydrolysis pursuant to the
provisions of subsection (d) of section 19a-320, as amended by this act,
and "large animals" means all cattle, horses, sheep, goat, swine or
similar species commonly kept as livestock.
Sec. 19. Section 20-442 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Employees of the Connecticut Labor Department performing their
duties in accordance with chapter 571 and federal employees of the
Occupational Safety and Health Administration performing their duties
in accordance with the federal Occupational Safety and Health Act are
exempt from the requirements of sections 19a-332d, 19a-332e and 20-435
to [20-441] 20-440, inclusive, as amended by this act.
Sec. 20. Subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 19a-37 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(1) "Laboratory or firm" means an environmental laboratory
[registered] certified by the Department of Public Health pursuant to
section 19a-29a, as amended by this act;
Sec. 21. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Agent of the local director of health" means a person who holds
an approval from the commissioner, pursuant to the regulations of
Connecticut state agencies, to investigate, inspect and approve plans
relating to subsurface sewage disposal systems;
Public Act No. 26-142 27 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
(2) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Public Health;
(3) "Department" means the Department of Public Health;
(4) "Local director of health" means a director of a (A) municipal
health department, appointed pursuant to section 19a-200 of the general
statutes, or (B) district health department, appointed pursuant to section
19a-242 of the general statutes;
(5) "Subsurface sewage enforcement officer" means a person who has
obtained certification from the commissioner to (A) review and approve
plans, (B) conduct regulatory inspections, (C) investigate complaints
relating to subsurface sewage disposal systems within the jurisdiction
of a local director of health, and (D) perform any other related duties as
prescribed by the commissioner;
(6) "Phase I subsurface sewage enforcement officer" means a person
certified by the commissioner to act as a subsurface sewage enforcement
officer for a subsurface sewage disposal system serving a building with
a design flow of up to two thousand gallons per day, except for such
subsurface sewage disposal systems designed by a professional
engineer licensed pursuant to chapter 391 of the general statutes;
(7) "Phase II subsurface sewage enforcement officer" means a person
certified by the commissioner to act as a subsurface sewage enforcement
officer for a subsurface sewage disposal system serving a building with
a design flow up to ten thousand gallons per day; and
(8) "Phase III subsurface sewage enforcement officer" means a person
certified by the commissioner to act as a subsurface sewage enforcement
officer for an alternative on-site sewage treatment system serving a
building with a design flow of ten thousand gallons per day or less.
(b) (1) On and after October 1, 2026, no person, including a licensed
environmental health specialist, as defined in section 20-358 of the
Public Act No. 26-142 28 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
general statutes, shall perform the duties of a subsurface sewage
enforcement officer unless such person is (A) certified by the
commissioner pursuant to the provisions of this section, and (B)
appointed by a local director of health to perform the duties of a
subsurface sewage enforcement officer as an employee or contractor of
the municipal health department or health district. The local director of
health shall maintain records of such appointments and provide the
department a copy of, or access to, such records upon the
commissioner's request.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, an agent of the
local director of health approved before October 1, 2026, may perform
the duties of a subsurface sewage enforcement officer for a local director
of health without obtaining certification pursuant to the provisions of
this section, provided such agent applies for an initial certification as a
subsurface sewage enforcement officer pursuant to the provisions of
this section not later than October 1, 2027.
(c) (1) An agent of the local director of health, who is approved to
investigate, inspect and approve all plans for subsurface sewage
disposal systems, except those prepared by a professional engineer
licensed pursuant to chapter 391 of the general statutes, shall seek initial
certification as a Phase I subsurface sewage enforcement officer. An
agent of the local director of health, who is approved to investigate,
inspect and approve plans for subsurface sewage disposal systems
prepared by a professional engineer, licensed pursuant to chapter 391 of
the general statutes, shall seek initial certification as a Phase II
subsurface sewage enforcement officer. After receiving initial
certification, such certification shall be renewed in accordance with the
provisions of subsection (e) of this section. On and after the date on
which the commissioner begins issuing certifications pursuant to the
provisions of this section, the commissioner shall not grant any approval
of an agent of the local director of health pursuant to the regulations of
Public Act No. 26-142 29 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
Connecticut state agencies.
(2) Employees or contractors of the department may conduct
regulatory inspections and investigate complaints concerning
subsurface sewage disposal systems on behalf of the department
without obtaining certification as a subsurface sewage enforcement
officer pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(3) An applicant for certification as a subsurface sewage enforcement
officer may perform the duties of a subsurface sewage enforcement
officer as part of a practical component of a training course, as described
in subsection (i) of this section, developed by the department that is
taught by department staff or an approved training provider holding a
certification for the certification level sought.
(d) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this
section, a person may apply, in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner, for an initial certification after (1) completing a training
course prescribed by the commissioner, and (2) receiving a passing score
on an examination prescribed by the commissioner for the subsurface
sewage enforcement officer certification level the applicant seeks. No
person may apply for certification as a Phase III subsurface sewage
enforcement officer earlier than the date on which minimum
requirements for alternative on-site sewage treatment systems are
established in accordance with the provisions of section 19a-35a of the
general statutes.
(e) There shall be no fee to apply for an initial subsurface sewage
enforcement officer certification or to renew such certification. A
certification shall be renewed in accordance with the provisions of
section 19a-88 of the general statutes, as amended by this act.
(f) The commissioner may require subsurface sewage enforcement
officers to attend conferences to provide information and updates
Public Act No. 26-142 30 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
regarding on-site sewage treatment systems, which may include, but
need not be limited to, a review of the department's technical standards
for the siting, design and installation requirements of a subsurface
sewage disposal system. The commissioner may conduct such
conferences in person, online or by prerecorded online presentations.
The commissioner shall not conduct more than two such conferences in
any one calendar year.
(g) A subsurface sewage enforcement officer shall only hold a
certification as a Phase I, Phase II or Phase III subsurface sewage
enforcement officer and shall not hold more than one such certification
at one time. A Phase I subsurface sewage enforcement officer shall only
perform activities associated with a Phase I subsurface sewage
enforcement officer certification. A Phase II subsurface sewage
enforcement officer may perform activities associated with a Phase I and
Phase II subsurface sewage enforcement officer certification. A Phase III
subsurface sewage enforcement officer may perform activities
associated with Phase I and Phase II subsurface sewage enforcement
officer certification and activities associated with alternative on-site
sewage treatment systems. No person shall apply for certification as a
Phase II subsurface sewage enforcement officer without having
previously obtained certification as a Phase I subsurface sewage
enforcement officer or served as an agent of a local director of health
prior to October 1, 2026. No person shall apply for certification as a
Phase III subsurface sewage enforcement officer without having
previously obtained certification as a Phase II subsurface sewage
enforcement officer.
(h) The commissioner shall develop the following initial certification
applications: (1) Phase I or Phase II subsurface sewage enforcement
officer for agents of local directors of health approved prior to October
1, 2026, which shall include an attestation of such approval prior to
October 1, 2026, (2) Phase I subsurface sewage enforcement officer, (3)
Public Act No. 26-142 31 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
Phase II subsurface sewage enforcement officer, and (4) Phase III
subsurface sewage enforcement officer. The commissioner shall also
develop a renewal certification application and an application for
training providers seeking the commissioner's approval to provide
subsurface sewage enforcement officer training courses pursuant to the
provisions of subsection (i) of this section.
(i) The commissioner shall develop training courses and
corresponding examinations for Phase I, Phase II and Phase III
subsurface sewage enforcement officers. The training courses may
include a practical component, plan reviews and homework. The
commissioner may approve training providers to teach the courses. To
be approved, a training provider shall demonstrate, in a form and
manner prescribed by the commissioner, that the training course and its
materials are consistent with the department's technical standards for
the siting, design and installation of subsurface sewage disposal
systems. Any approval granted pursuant to the provisions of this
subsection shall expire three years after the date of such approval. The
commissioner may administer or contract with a testing center to
administer training courses or certification examinations.
(j) The commissioner may adopt regulations concerning the
certification of subsurface sewage enforcement officers, in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, that shall
include, but need not be limited to: (1) The scope of duties performed
by each certification of subsurface sewage enforcement officer; (2)
requirements and procedures for the issuance of an initial certification;
(3) requirements and procedures to renew certification, in accordance
with section 19a-88 of the general statutes, as amended by this act; (4)
standards and procedures for certification examinations administered
by the commissioner or a testing center; (5) training standards required
for initial and renewal certification; and (6) standards and procedures
for the commissioner's approval of training providers and courses of
Public Act No. 26-142 32 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
study offered by training providers. The commissioner may implement
policies and procedures necessary to implement the provisions of this
section while in the process of adopting such policies and procedures as
regulations, provided the commissioner publishes notice of intent to
adopt regulations on the eRegulations System not later than twenty
days after the date of implementation of such policies and procedures.
Policies and procedures implemented pursuant to this subsection shall
be valid until final regulations are adopted in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes.
(k) (1) The commissioner may take any disciplinary action against a
subsurface sewage enforcement officer permitted under section 19a-17
of the general statutes, except for the assessment of a civil penalty, for
any of the following reasons: (A) Fraud or material deception in
obtaining initial certification or renewal certification or the
reinstatement of a certificate; (B) fraudulent practices including, but not
limited to, acceptance of bribes in the performance of the subsurface
sewage enforcement officer's professional activities; (C) incompetent,
negligent or illegal performance of the subsurface sewage enforcement
officer's professional duties; (D) conviction of the subsurface sewage
enforcement officer for a felony; or (E) failure of the subsurface sewage
enforcement officer to complete the mandatory training or attend
mandatory conferences.
(2) The commissioner may take any disciplinary action against a
training provider permitted under section 19a-17 of the general statutes,
except for the assessment of a civil penalty, if the commissioner
determines that (A) a training course's hours or materials were not
consistent with the department's technical standards for the siting,
design and installation of subsurface sewage disposal systems; or (B) the
training provider engaged in incompetent, negligent or illegal activities
in the provision of training courses.
Sec. 22. Subsection (c) of section 19a-14 of the 2026 supplement to the
Public Act No. 26-142 33 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(c) No board shall exist for the following professions that are licensed
or otherwise regulated by the Department of Public Health:
(1) Speech and language pathologist and audiologist;
(2) Hearing instrument specialist;
(3) Nursing home administrator;
(4) Environmental health specialist;
(5) Subsurface sewage system installer or cleaner;
(6) Marital and family therapist and marriage and family therapist
associate;
(7) Nurse-midwife;
(8) Licensed clinical social worker;
(9) Respiratory care practitioner;
(10) Asbestos contractor, asbestos consultant and asbestos training
provider;
(11) Massage therapist;
(12) Registered nurse's aide;
(13) Radiographer;
(14) Dental hygienist;
(15) Dietitian-Nutritionist;
Public Act No. 26-142 34 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
(16) Asbestos abatement worker;
(17) Asbestos abatement site supervisor;
(18) Licensed or certified alcohol and drug counselor;
(19) Professional counselor and professional counselor associate;
(20) Acupuncturist;
(21) Occupational therapist and occupational therapist assistant;
(22) Lead abatement contractor, lead consultant contractor, lead
consultant, lead abatement supervisor, lead abatement worker, lead
training provider, lead inspector, lead inspector risk assessor and lead
planner-project designer;
(23) Emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician, emergency medical responder and emergency medical
services instructor;
(24) Paramedic;
(25) Athletic trainer;
(26) Perfusionist;
(27) Master social worker subject to the provisions of section 20-195v;
(28) Radiologist assistant, subject to the provisions of section 20-74tt;
(29) Homeopathic physician;
(30) Certified water treatment plant operator, certified distribution
system operator, certified small water system operator, certified
backflow prevention device tester and certified cross connection survey
inspector, including certified limited operators, certified conditional
Public Act No. 26-142 35 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
operators and certified operators in training;
(31) Tattoo technician;
(32) Genetic counselor;
(33) Behavior analyst;
(34) Art therapist;
(35) Esthetician;
(36) Eyelash technician; [and]
(37) Nail technician; and
(38) Subsurface sewage enforcement officer.
The department shall assume all powers and duties normally vested
with a board in administering regulatory jurisdiction over such
professions. The uniform provisions of this chapter and chapters 368v,
369 to 381a, inclusive, 383 to 388, inclusive, 393a, 395, 398, 399, 400a and
400c, including, but not limited to, standards for entry and renewal;
grounds for professional discipline; receiving and processing
complaints; and disciplinary sanctions, shall apply, except as otherwise
provided by law, to the professions listed in this subsection.
Sec. 23. Subsection (c) of section 19a-14 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes, as amended by section 196 of public act 25-168, is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(c) No board shall exist for the following professions that are licensed
or otherwise regulated by the Department of Public Health:
(1) Speech and language pathologist and audiologist;
Public Act No. 26-142 36 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
(2) Hearing instrument specialist;
(3) Nursing home administrator;
(4) Environmental health specialist;
(5) Subsurface sewage system installer or cleaner;
(6) Marital and family therapist and marriage and family therapist
associate;
(7) Nurse-midwife;
(8) Licensed clinical social worker;
(9) Respiratory care practitioner;
(10) Asbestos contractor, asbestos consultant and asbestos training
provider;
(11) Massage therapist;
(12) Registered nurse's aide;
(13) Radiographer;
(14) Dental hygienist;
(15) Dietitian-Nutritionist;
(16) Asbestos abatement worker;
(17) Asbestos abatement site supervisor;
(18) Licensed or certified alcohol and drug counselor;
(19) Professional counselor and professional counselor associate;
(20) Acupuncturist;
Public Act No. 26-142 37 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
(21) Occupational therapist and occupational therapist assistant;
(22) Lead abatement contractor, lead consultant contractor, lead
consultant, lead abatement supervisor, lead abatement worker, lead
training provider, lead inspector, lead inspector risk assessor and lead
planner-project designer;
(23) Emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician, emergency medical responder and emergency medical
services instructor;
(24) Paramedic;
(25) Athletic trainer;
(26) Perfusionist;
(27) Master social worker subject to the provisions of section 20-195v;
(28) Radiologist assistant, subject to the provisions of section 20-74tt;
(29) Homeopathic physician;
(30) Certified water treatment plant operator, certified distribution
system operator, certified small water system operator, certified
backflow prevention device tester and certified cross connection survey
inspector, including certified limited operators, certified conditional
operators and certified operators in training;
(31) Tattoo technician;
(32) Genetic counselor;
(33) Behavior analyst;
(34) Art therapist;
Public Act No. 26-142 38 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
(35) Esthetician;
(36) Eyelash technician;
(37) Nail technician; [and]
(38) Subsurface sewage enforcement officer; and
[(38)] (39) Lactation consultant.
The department shall assume all powers and duties normally vested
with a board in administering regulatory jurisdiction over such
professions. The uniform provisions of this chapter and chapters 368v,
369 to 381a, inclusive, 382e to 388, inclusive, 393a, 395, 398, 399, 400a and
400c, including, but not limited to, standards for entry and renewal;
grounds for professional discipline; receiving and processing
complaints; and disciplinary sanctions, shall apply, except as otherwise
provided by law, to the professions listed in this subsection.
Sec. 24. Subsection (e) of section 19a-88 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(e) (1) Each person holding a license or certificate issued under
section 19a-514, 20-65k, 20-74s, 20-185k, 20-185l, 20-195cc or 20-206ll and
chapters 370 to 373, inclusive, 375, 378 to 381a, inclusive, 383 to 383c,
inclusive, 383g, 384, 384a, 384b, 385, 393a, 395, 399 or 400a and section
20-206n or 20-206o shall, annually, or, in the case of a person holding a
license as a marital and family therapist associate under section 20-195c
on or before twenty-four months after the date of initial licensure,
during the month of such person's birth, apply for renewal of such
license or certificate to the Department of Public Health, giving such
person's name in full, such person's residence and business address and
such other information as the department requests.
Public Act No. 26-142 39 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
(2) Each person holding a license or certificate issued under section
19a-514, and chapters 384a, 384c, 384d, 386, 387, 388 and 398 shall apply
for renewal of such license or certificate once every two years, during
the month of such person's birth, giving such person's name in full, such
person's residence and business address and such other information as
the department requests.
(3) Each person holding a certificate issued under section 20-195ttt
shall apply for renewal of such certificate once every three years, during
the month of such person's birth, giving such person's name in full, such
person's residence and business address and such other information as
the department requests.
(4) Each person holding a license or certificate issued pursuant to
chapter 400c shall, annually, during the month of such person's birth,
apply for renewal of such license or certificate to the department. Each
lead training provider certified pursuant to chapter 400c and each
asbestos training provider certified pursuant to chapter 400a shall,
annually, during the anniversary month of such training provider's
initial certification, apply for renewal of such certificate to the
department.
(5) Each entity holding a license issued pursuant to section 20-475
shall, annually, during the anniversary month of initial licensure, apply
for renewal of such license or certificate to the department.
(6) Each person holding a license issued pursuant to section 20-162bb
shall, annually, during the month of such person's birth, apply for
renewal of such license to the Department of Public Health, upon
payment of a fee of three hundred twenty dollars, giving such person's
name in full, such person's residence and business address and such
other information as the department requests.
(7) Each person holding a license issued pursuant to section 20-278h
Public Act No. 26-142 40 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
shall, once every two years, during the anniversary month of initial
licensure, apply for renewal of such license to the department.
(8) Each person holding a certificate pursuant to section 21 of this act
shall, on or before three years after the date of issuance of an initial or
renewal certification, apply for renewal of such certificate to the
department.
Sec. 25. Subsection (e) of section 19a-88 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes, as amended by section 197 of public act 25-168, is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(e) (1) Each person holding a license or certificate issued under
section 19a-514, 20-65k, 20-74s, 20-185k, 20-185l, 20-195cc or 20-206ll and
chapters 370 to 373, inclusive, 375, 378 to 381a, inclusive, 383 to 383c,
inclusive, 383g, 384, 384a, 384b, 385, 393a, 395, 399 or 400a and section
20-206n or 20-206o shall, annually, or, in the case of a person holding a
license as a marital and family therapist associate under section 20-195c
on or before twenty-four months after the date of initial licensure,
during the month of such person's birth, apply for renewal of such
license or certificate to the Department of Public Health, giving such
person's name in full, such person's residence and business address and
such other information as the department requests.
(2) Each person holding a license or certificate issued under section
19a-514, and chapters 382e, 384a, 384c, 384d, 386, 387, 388 and 398 shall
apply for renewal of such license or certificate once every two years,
during the month of such person's birth, giving such person's name in
full, such person's residence and business address and such other
information as the department requests.
(3) Each person holding a certificate issued under section 20-195ttt
shall apply for renewal of such certificate once every three years, during
Public Act No. 26-142 41 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
the month of such person's birth, giving such person's name in full, such
person's residence and business address and such other information as
the department requests.
(4) Each person holding a license or certificate issued pursuant to
chapter 400c shall, annually, during the month of such person's birth,
apply for renewal of such license or certificate to the department. Each
lead training provider certified pursuant to chapter 400c and each
asbestos training provider certified pursuant to chapter 400a shall,
annually, during the anniversary month of such training provider's
initial certification, apply for renewal of such certificate to the
department.
(5) Each entity holding a license issued pursuant to section 20-475
shall, annually, during the anniversary month of initial licensure, apply
for renewal of such license or certificate to the department.
(6) Each person holding a license issued pursuant to section 20-162bb
shall, annually, during the month of such person's birth, apply for
renewal of such license to the Department of Public Health, upon
payment of a fee of three hundred twenty dollars, giving such person's
name in full, such person's residence and business address and such
other information as the department requests.
(7) Each person holding a license issued pursuant to section 20-278h
shall, once every two years, during the anniversary month of initial
licensure, apply for renewal of such license to the department.
(8) Each person holding a certificate pursuant to section 21 of this act
shall, on or before three years after the date of issuance of an initial or
renewal certification, apply for renewal of such certificate to the
department.
Sec. 26. Subsection (n) of section 25-32 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
Public Act No. 26-142 42 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
2026):
(n) (1) On and after the effective date of regulations adopted under
this subsection, no person shall operate any water treatment plant,
water distribution system or small water system that treats or supplies
water used or intended for use by the public, test any backflow
prevention device, perform a cross connection survey without a
certificate issued by the commissioner under this subsection or operate
any water treatment plant or water distribution system as an operator-
in-training unless such person is issued a certificate by the
commissioner under this subsection. The commissioner shall adopt
regulations, in accordance with chapter 54, to provide: (A) Standards for
the operation of such water treatment plants, water distribution systems
and small water systems; (B) standards and procedures for the issuance
of certificates to operators and operators-in-training of such water
treatment plants and water distribution systems and operators of small
water systems, including, but not limited to, standards and procedures
for the department's approval of third parties to administer certification
examinations to such operators and operators-in-training; (C)
procedures for the renewal of such certificates to operators every three
years; (D) standards for training required for the issuance or renewal of
a certificate; (E) standards and procedures for the department's
approval of course providers and courses of study as they relate to
certified operators and certified operators-in-training of water treatment
plants and water distribution systems and certified operators of small
water systems and certified persons who test backflow prevention
devices or perform cross connection surveys for initial and renewal
applications; and (F) standards and procedures for the issuance and
renewal of certificates to persons who test backflow prevention devices
or perform cross connection surveys. Such regulations shall be
consistent with applicable federal law and guidelines for operator
certification programs promulgated by the United States Environmental
Protection Agency. For purposes of this subsection, "small water
Public Act No. 26-142 43 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
system" means a public water system, as defined in section 25-33d, that
serves less than one thousand persons and has no treatment or has only
treatment that does not require any chemical treatment, process
adjustment, backwashing or media regeneration by an operator.
(2) The commissioner may take any disciplinary action set forth in
section 19a-17, except for the assessment of a civil penalty under
subdivision (7) of subsection (a) of section 19a-17, against an operator,
an operator-in-training, a person who tests backflow prevention devices
or a person who performs cross connection surveys holding a certificate
issued under this subsection for any of the following reasons: (A) Fraud
or material deception in procuring a certificate, the renewal of a
certificate or the reinstatement of a certificate; (B) fraud or material
deception in the performance of the certified operator's or certified
operator-in-training's professional activities; (C) incompetent, negligent
or illegal performance of the certified operator's or certified operator-in-
training's professional activities; (D) conviction of the certified operator
or certified operator-in-training for a felony; or (E) failure of the certified
operator or certified operator-in-training to complete the training
required under subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) The commissioner may issue an initial certificate to perform a
function set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection upon receipt of a
completed application, in a form prescribed by the commissioner,
together with an application fee as follows: (A) For a water treatment
plant, water distribution system or small water system operator
certificate, or operator-in-training certificate for a water treatment plant
or water distribution system, two hundred twenty-four dollars, except
there shall be no such application fee required for a student enrolled in
an accredited high school small water system operator certification
course; (B) for a backflow prevention device tester certificate, one
hundred fifty-four dollars; and (C) for a cross-connection survey
inspector certificate, one hundred fifty-four dollars. A certificate issued
Public Act No. 26-142 44 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
pursuant to this subdivision shall expire three years from the date of
issuance unless renewed by the certificate holder prior to such
expiration date, except a certificate issued for an operator-in-training
pursuant to this section shall expire six years from the date of issuance
and shall not be renewable. The commissioner may renew a certificate,
other than a certificate for an operator-in-training, for an additional
three years upon receipt of a completed renewal application, in a form
prescribed by the commissioner, together with a renewal application fee
as follows: (i) For a water treatment plant, water distribution system or
small water system operator certificate, ninety-eight dollars; (ii) for a
backflow prevention device tester certificate, sixty-nine dollars; and (iii)
for a cross-connection survey inspector certificate, sixty-nine dollars.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions (1) and (3) of this
subsection, the commissioner may issue a certification to an applicant
for water treatment plant operator, water distribution system operator
or small water system operator under this subsection upon receiving
such applicant's written application, in a form and manner prescribed
by the commissioner, if the applicant (A) is an apprentice registered
with the Labor Department, (B) has successfully completed an
apprenticeship approved by the Labor Department and conducted in
accordance with sections 31-22m to 31-22u, inclusive, for the type of
system for which the apprentice is seeking certification, and (C) has
passed a written examination prescribed in the regulations of
Connecticut state agencies after completion of an approved registered
apprenticeship program for the classification level sought for
certification. An apprentice shall provide written notification to the
department not later than ten days before participating in such
apprenticeship program. Such written notification shall be in a form and
manner prescribed by the commissioner and shall include, but need not
be limited to, information regarding the entity providing the
apprenticeship program and the certified water operator or operators
directly supervising such program. A registered apprentice shall be
Public Act No. 26-142 45 of 46

Substitute House Bill No. 5518
under direct supervision of a certified water operator of the type of
system for which the apprentice is seeking certification but shall not
make any process and system integrity decisions concerning the quality
and quantity of water that affects public health. Failure of a certified
water operator to provide the supervision required under this section
shall be grounds for disciplinary action against the certified water
operator pursuant to the provisions of this section.
Sec. 27. Section 20-441 of the general statutes is repealed. (Effective
October 1, 2026)
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-142 46 of 46